Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Operator’s License
186.4122.
Personal identification card application for United States citizen or permanent resident — Photograph — Scanning and retaining of application information — Proof of residency — Issuance of personal identification card and operator’s license or instruction permit — Term of identification card.

As used in this section, “applicant” means a person who is a citizen or permanent resident of the United States.

The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant who:

Is a Kentucky resident;

Applies in person to the cabinet or through alternative technology; and

Complies with the provisions of this section.

Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the cabinet shall electronically scan the documents required for application under this section and shall electronically retain the application, supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant. The cabinet shall present the applicant with a temporary personal identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent personal identification card is mailed to the applicant by the Transportation Cabinet.

The cabinet shall only electronically scan the birth certificate of an individual applying for a voluntary travel ID personal identification card. If the applicant is not seeking such a document, the cabinet shall not electronically scan the applicant’s birth certificate.

An applicant for a personal identification card shall not be required to surrender the applicant’s birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless express consent is given by the applicant during the course of obtaining a voluntary travel ID personal identification card.

An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the same information as is required for an operator’s license under KRS

186.412

, except if an applicant does not have a fixed, permanent address, the applicant may use as proof of residency a signed letter from a homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency currently providing the applicant treatment or services and attesting that the applicant is a resident of Kentucky. An applicant who does not have a fixed, permanent address shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID personal identification card.

It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification card to include as an applicant’s most current resident address a mailing address or an address provided on a voter registration card.

If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on the application form, the applicant shall swear that he or she has permission from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal owner, or possessor to use the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.

Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall swear an oath to the cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained on the application form.

A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who was issued the card presents false or misleading information to the cabinet when applying for the card.

A personal identification card issued under this section shall be valid for a period of eight (8) years from the date of issuance, except that if the personal identification card is issued to a person who does not have a fixed, permanent address, then the personal identification card shall be valid for one (1) year from the date of issuance.

An applicant may be issued a personal identification card if the applicant currently holds a valid Kentucky instruction permit or operator’s license, except that a person shall not hold more than one (1) license or personal identification card that is a voluntary travel ID identity document which indicates that it meets the requirements for federal identification under Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II, as referenced in KRS 186.4102(8).

If a person’s instruction permit or operator’s license has been suspended or revoked, the person may be issued a personal identification card. Subject to the limitations in paragraph (a) of this subsection, a personal identification card may be surrendered when the person applies to have his or her instruction permit or operator’s license reinstated.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 4, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 7, effective March 27, 2020.

186.4123.
Personal identification card application for non-United States citizen or permanent resident — Photograph — Scanning of application documents — Proof of residency — Immigration documentation — Immigration status and personal identity verification — Term of identification card.

As used in this section, “applicant” means a person who is not a United States citizen and has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United States.

The Transportation Cabinet shall issue a personal identification card to an applicant who:

Is a Kentucky resident;

Applies in person to either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office; and

Complies with the provisions of this section.

Upon application for a personal identification card under this section, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the applicant in accordance with KRS 186.4102(1).

The cabinet shall electronically scan the documents required for application under this section, supporting documents, and the photograph of the applicant into the cabinet’s database.

An application for a personal identification card shall be accompanied by the same information as is required for an operator’s license under KRS

186.412

, along with other documents required under this section, except if an applicant does not have a fixed, permanent address, the applicant may use as proof of residency a signed letter from a homeless shelter, health care facility, or social service agency currently providing the applicant treatment or services and attesting that the applicant is a resident of Kentucky. An applicant who does not have a fixed, permanent address shall not be issued a voluntary travel ID personal identification card.

It shall be permissible for the application form for a personal identification card to include as an applicant’s most current resident address a mailing address or an address provided on a voter registration card.

If the applicant is not the legal owner or possessor of the address provided on the application form, the applicant shall swear that he or she has permission from the legal owner, authorized agent for the legal owner, or possessor to use the address for purposes of obtaining the personal identification card.

The application form under this section shall be accompanied by the applicant’s documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, authorizing the applicant to be in the United States. The Transportation Cabinet shall verify the information submitted under this subsection through the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements (SAVE) program.

The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall be accompanied by an original or certified copy of the applicant’s completed marriage license signed by the official who presided over the marriage ceremony and two (2) witnesses. The application form of a special status individual with a K-1 status shall also include the applicant’s petition to enter the United States for the purpose of marriage that contains the name of the prospective spouse. If the name of the prospective spouse on the petition does not match the name of the spouse on the marriage license, the Transportation Cabinet shall not be required to issue an operator’s license.

The Transportation Cabinet shall verify and validate the immigration status and personal identity of an applicant under this section through federal government systems and databases.

If an applicant’s identity and immigration status is validated, the cabinet shall capture a photograph of the applicant, and scan the required documents into the cabinet’s database, and shall present the applicant with a temporary personal identification card, which shall be valid for thirty (30) days until a permanent personal identification card is mailed to the applicant.

An applicant under this section shall only be issued a standard personal identification card.

An applicant shall apply to renew a personal identification card, or obtain a duplicate personal identification card, at the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office.

If a person has any type of change in his or her immigration status, the person shall apply to update with either the Transportation Cabinet in Frankfort or a Transportation Cabinet field office within ten (10) days.

Every applicant for a personal identification card under this section shall swear an oath to the Transportation Cabinet as to the truthfulness of the statements contained on the application form.

A personal identification card may be suspended or revoked if the person who was issued the card presents false or misleading information to the cabinet when applying for the card.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an initial or renewal personal identification card issued to an applicant who is not a special status individual shall be valid for a period equal to the length of time the applicant’s documentation from the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is valid, or eight (8) years, whichever time period is shorter.

An initial or renewal personal identification card shall be valid for a period of one (1) year if:

The applicant is not a special status individual and the applicant’s documentation issued by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, is issued for an indefinite period of time and does not have an expiration date. The fee shall be the same as for a regular personal identification card; or

The personal identification card is issued to a person who does not have a fixed, permanent address.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 5, effective January 1, 2019.

186.4125.
Documentation required for voluntary travel ID — Use of original hospital birth certificate as proof of applicant’s age — Application for exception to allow use of birth certificates.

In order to apply for a voluntary travel ID identity document under KRS

186.403

, the applicant shall present the applicant’s certified birth certificate or a valid, unexpired, United States passport or Permanent Resident Card (Form I- 551).

For the purposes of KRS

186.400

to

186.640

, an original hospital birth certificate signed by the attending physician shall be acceptable as certifying the birth date of an applicant for a standard instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card.

The Transportation Cabinet shall apply to the United States Department of Homeland Security for an exception to allow birth certificates described in subsection (2) of this section to be used to apply for a voluntary travel ID identity document under KRS

186.403

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 287, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 100, § 14, effective January 1, 2019.

186.413.
Commission to determine color photo process to be used. [Repealed.]

186.414.
Duration of licenses — Renewal — Extension of licenses of servicemen. [Repealed.]

186.415.
Application for operator’s license by military enlistee — Conditions.

Notwithstanding KRS

186.450

,

186.452

, and

186.454

, a person who is under eighteen (18) years of age may apply for an operator’s license if the person has:

Held an instruction permit for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days; and

Enlisted in the United States Armed Forces or a state National Guard.

An individual eligible to apply for an operator’s license under this section shall present proof of enlistment at the time of application.

History.

Enact. Acts 2009, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 25, 2009.

186.416.
Renewal of operator’s license by mail for military personnel and spouse and dependents stationed outside of Kentucky — Veteran’s designation on operator’s license or personal ID card.

If a resident of the Commonwealth currently serving in the United States military is stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth, the resident, or the resident’s spouse or dependents, may renew a Class D operator’s license issued under this section by mail. If the resident, or his or her spouse or dependents, was issued an “under 21” operator’s license, upon the date of the license holder’s twenty-first birthday, the “under 21” operator’s license may be renewed for an operator’s license that no longer contains the outdated reference to being “under 21.”

A resident of the Commonwealth renewing an operator’s license by mail under subsection (1) of this section may have a personal designee apply to the cabinet on behalf of the resident to renew the resident’s operator’s license. An operator’s license being renewed by mail under subsection (1) of this section shall be issued a license bearing the applicant’s historical photo if there is a photo on file. If there is no photo on file, the license shall be issued without a photograph and shall show in the space provided for the photograph the legend “valid without photo and signature.”

If a resident of the Commonwealth has been serving in the United States military stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth and has allowed his or her operator’s license to expire, he or she shall, within ninety (90) days of returning to the Commonwealth, be permitted to renew his or her license without having to take a written test or road test.
(3) (a) 1. If a resident of the Commonwealth has been serving in the United States military stationed or assigned to a base or other location outside the boundaries of the Commonwealth and has allowed his or her operator’s license to expire, he or she shall, within ninety (90) days of returning to the Commonwealth, be permitted to renew his or her license without having to take a written test or road test.

The spouse or dependent of a person identified in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph shall be afforded the same consideration identified in that subparagraph regarding the renewal of an expired operator’s license.

A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not be convicted or cited for driving on an expired license prior to license renewal during the ninety (90) days after the person’s return to the Commonwealth if the person can provide proof of his or her out-of-state service and dates of assignment.

A person who meets the criteria in paragraph (a) of this subsection and who does not renew his or her license within ninety (90) days of returning to the Commonwealth shall be required to comply with the provisions of this chapter governing renewal of a license that has expired.

If a resident of the Commonwealth has been issued an “under 21” or “under 21 CDL” operator’s license and the person is unable to renew the license on the date of his or her twenty-first birthday, the “under 21” or “under 21 CDL” operator’s license shall be valid for ninety (90) days beyond the date of the person’s twenty-first birthday.

Any person who served in the active Armed Forces of the United States, including the Coast Guard, and any member of the National Guard or Reserve Component who completed the member’s term of service and was released, separated, discharged, or retired therefrom under either an honorable discharge or a general under honorable conditions discharge may, at the time of initial application or application for renewal or duplicate, request that an operator’s license or a personal identification card issued under this chapter bear the word “veteran” on the face or the back of the license or personal identification card.

The designation shall be in a style and format considered appropriate by the Transportation Cabinet. Prior to obtaining a designation requested under this subsection, the applicant shall present to the cabinet as proof of eligibility, an original or copy of his or her:

Unexpired Veteran Identification Card or Veteran Health Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs;

DD-2, DD-214, DD-256, DD-257, or NGB-22 form; or

Unexpired Geneva Conventions Identification Card issued by the United States Department of Defense.

The cabinet shall not be liable for fraudulent or misread forms presented.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 9, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 8, effective March 27, 2020; 2020 ch. 42, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 65, § 2, effective June 29, 2021.

186.417.
Issuance of operator’s license or personal identification card to released felon — Documentation required — Processing and issuance — Administrative regulations governing operator’s licenses for eligible current inmates.

The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender is eligible, released from the Kentucky Department of Corrections or a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Kentucky on home incarceration, parole, completed service of sentence, shock probation, or pardon, a personal identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an operator’s license. An offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card or operator’s license shall provide proper documentation to comply with the provisions of this section.

Proper documentation under subsection (1) of this section shall consist of:

The offender’s certificate of birth;

A copy of the offender’s resident record card and parole certificate or notice of discharge;

A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and

A release letter that shall contain the offender’s:

Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Kentucky Department of Corrections or a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Kentucky;

Discharge/release date;

Signature;

Social Security number;

Date of birth;

Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and

Physical description.

The Transportation Cabinet shall issue to any felony offender, if the felony offender is eligible, probated or conditionally discharged by the court and under the supervision of the Division of Probation and Parole or the United States Probation Office, a personal identification card or, if the felony offender is eligible, an operator’s license. An offender who wishes to obtain a personal identification card or operator’s license shall provide proper documentation to comply with the provisions of this section.

Proper documentation under subsection (3) of this section shall consist of:

The offender’s certificate of birth;

The offender’s sentencing order;

A photograph of the offender, printed on plastic card or paper; and

A notarized release letter, signed by the supervising officer verifying the offender’s status on supervision, that shall contain the offender’s:

Full legal name, subject to the information available to the Division of Probation and Parole or the United States Probation Office;

Signature;

Social Security number;

Date of birth;

Present Kentucky address where he or she resides; and

Physical description.

The offender shall present the documentation identified in subsection (2) or (4) of this section to the cabinet within thirty (30) calendar days from the date of the release letter and shall be responsible for paying the fee for the personal identification card or operator’s license pursuant to KRS

186.531

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to establish procedures for current inmates in state and federal prisons, who are deemed eligible by prison officials, to be issued operator’s licenses to engage in work release activities or reentry initiatives. The administrative regulations shall address, at a minimum:

The information required for application, which shall include all information in paragraph (b) of this subsection which is germane to a current inmate. For purposes of this paragraph, the facility in which the inmate is housed shall be considered the inmate’s residence;

Required documentation from the Department of Corrections or the Federal Bureau of Prisons that the inmate meets the security criteria to be eligible for work outside of the facility;

Procedures for license issuance; and

Restrictions on use of the license, including a requirement that the inmate shall surrender the license to prison officials when the inmate is not engaged in work outside the facility.

The cabinet shall process applications for operator’s licenses and personal identification cards under this section in the same manner as in KRS

186.412

and

186.4122

.

The Transportation Cabinet may enter into an agreement with the Kentucky Department of Corrections, the United States Probation Office, or the Federal Bureau of Prisons to use a mobile unit to begin the issuance process in this section.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 7, effective January 1, 2019; 2018 ch. 74, § 1, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 9, effective March 27, 2020.

186.418.
Voluntary statewide child identification program — Travel ID child identification — Fee — Term of child identification card.

The Transportation Cabinet shall implement a voluntary statewide child identification program. The program shall issue a photo personal identification card to a child two (2) to fifteen (15) years of age.

A parent or guardian may apply for a child identification card under this section at the cabinet. Application for a child identification card shall be accompanied by a Social Security card and a birth certificate for the child or other proof of the child’s date of birth as provided under KRS

186.412

. The card shall not contain the child’s Social Security number.

If the child’s parent or guardian wishes to obtain a travel ID child identification card, the cabinet shall scan the application and supporting documentation, capture a photograph of the child in accordance with the provisions of KRS 186.4102(1), and issue the child identification card by mail.

If the child’s parent or guardian does not wish to obtain a travel ID child identification card, the cabinet shall scan the application, capture a photograph of the child in accordance with the provisions of KRS 186.4102(1), and issue the child identification card by mail.

A parent or guardian applying under this section shall not be required to surrender the child’s birth certificate for image capture, image storage, or image transmission to any entity, including the federal government, unless express consent is given by the parent or guardian during the course of obtaining a voluntary travel ID child identification card.

A child identification card issued under this section shall contain the child’s name and the toll-free number of the Kentucky missing persons clearinghouse, Department of Kentucky State Police. The descriptive data and a photo image of the child shall be stored in the Kentucky driver’s license information system and may be retrieved and used by public agencies subject to the provisions of the Driver’s Privacy Protection Act, 18

U.S.C. sec. 2721

, and may also be used by the Kentucky missing persons clearinghouse.

The fee for a child identification card shall be six dollars ($6), which shall be deposited into the KYTC photo license account established in KRS

174.056

.

A child identification card shall expire every four (4) years on the child’s birthday. Within the time period that the child identification card is valid, the card may be updated with a new photograph and information. The fee for an updated card shall be six dollars ($6), with the fee distributed in the same manner as the fee for an initial card as described in subsection (5) of this section.

If a parent or guardian complies with the requirements of KRS

186.403

and

186.419

, the parent or guardian may request that the child identification card issued to a minor child under this section be a voluntary travel ID identity document under KRS

186.403

.

A child identification card issued under this section shall contain a denotation that either:

The child identification card is a voluntary travel ID identity document that complies with the security standards set forth by Pub. L. No. 109-13, Title II, and may be used for identification for federal purposes; or

The identity document shall not be used for federal identification purposes.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 8, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 10, effective March 27, 2020.

186.419.
Additional documentation required for voluntary travel ID permit, license, or identification card — Administrative regulations — Proof of physical address and citizenship or immigration status.

In addition to the information required under KRS

186.412

,

186.412

1,

186.4122

, and

186.4123

, an applicant for a voluntary travel ID instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card under KRS

186.403

shall present two (2) of the following documents upon application or renewal that show the name and physical residential address of the applicant:

Utility bill that is less than one (1) year old;

Current lease or rental agreement;

Bank statement that is less than one (1) year old;

Mortgage statement;

Telephone bill that is less than one (1) year old;

Current insurance policy;

State or federal tax return that is less than one (1) year old;

Pay slip or salary statement that is less than one (1) year old;

Record from an educational institution in Kentucky which establishes enrollment;

Kentucky voter registration card that is less than one (1) year old;

Current property tax bill;

Current vehicle registration;

Current operator’s license, instruction permit, or personal identification card;

Postmarked mail that is less than one (1) year old;

Internal Revenue Service form W-2 from the most recent tax year available; or

Internal Revenue Service form 1099 from the most recent tax year available.

Any of the documents described in subsection (1) of this section that contains the name of the spouse of the applicant, together with a certified copy of the applicant’s marriage license or marriage certificate, shall be considered acceptable documentation of proof of residence under subsection (1) of this section.

The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations under KRS Chapter 13A to identify additional documentation that would satisfy the proof of residence requirement under this section.

A Kentucky post office box address is not sufficient proof of physical address for purposes of this section.

The cabinet may require additional proof of physical address if the cabinet questions the validity or authenticity of the proof of physical address submitted by the applicant.

In addition to the information required under KRS

186.412

,

186.412

1,

186.4122

, and

186.4123

, an applicant for a voluntary travel ID instruction permit, operator’s license, or personal identification card under KRS

186.403

shall present valid documentary evidence that the applicant:

Is a citizen or national of the United States;

Is an alien lawfully admitted for permanent or temporary residence in the United States;

Has conditional permanent resident status in the United States;

Has an approved application for asylum in the United States or has entered into the United States in refugee status;

Has a valid, unexpired nonimmigrant visa or nonimmigrant visa status for entry into the United States;

Has a pending application for asylum in the United States;

Has a pending or approved application for temporary protected status in the United States;

Has approved deferred action status; or

Has a pending application for adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence in the United States or conditional permanent resident status in the United States.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 100, § 11, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 11, effective March 27, 2020.

186.420.
Exemption of operators of road or farm machinery and persons in Armed Forces.

No person need obtain an operator’s license to operate a road roller, road machinery or any tractor or implement of husbandry temporarily drawn or propelled on the highways.

Every person in the service of the Army, Navy or Marine Corps of the United States, when furnished with an operator’s permit from the United States, shall be exempt from an operator’s license when operating an official vehicle in the course of his service.

History.

2739m-35: amend. Acts 1944, ch. 74; 1948, ch. 208, § 4; 1950, ch. 176, § 2.

186.430.
Exemptions from Kentucky operator’s license requirement.

Except as provided in subsection (2) or (6) of this section, a person over the age of sixteen (16) who is a United States citizen and who is not a resident of Kentucky may drive in Kentucky for a period of time not to exceed one (1) year from the date the person enters Kentucky if:

The person possesses a valid license issued by the person’s home state;

The person has the license in his or her immediate possession at all times when operating a vehicle on the highways; and

The person’s home state accords similar privileges to licensed residents of Kentucky.

A person who is a United States citizen but who is not a resident of Kentucky who is enrolled as a full-time or part-time student at a university, college, or technical college located in Kentucky may drive in Kentucky on a valid license issued by the person’s state of domicile, and shall not be required to obtain a Kentucky operator’s license under this chapter if the person has a student identification card from a university, college, or technical college located in Kentucky in his or her immediate possession at all times when driving in Kentucky.

A person over the age of sixteen (16) who is not a United States citizen and who is legally visiting this country for less than one (1) year may drive in Kentucky on a valid domestic license issued by the person’s country of domicile and shall not be required to obtain a Kentucky driver’s license.

A person over the age of sixteen (16) who is not a United States citizen, who has not been granted status as a permanent resident of the United States, but is a resident of Kentucky, shall be issued a Kentucky operator’s license if the person complies with the requirements of KRS

186.4121

. The cabinet may at any time refuse or discontinue the exemptions authorized in this section for any grounds and may deny, cancel, suspend, or revoke an instruction permit or operator’s license issued under this chapter.

A person whose operator’s license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped in this state has been denied, withdrawn, canceled, suspended, or revoked as provided in KRS

186.400

to

186.640

shall not operate a motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped in this state under a license, permit, or registration certificate issued by any other jurisdiction during the period of denial, withdrawal, cancellation, suspension, or revocation.

The following persons may drive in Kentucky on a valid operator’s license issued by the person’s state or United States territory of domicile and shall not be required to obtain a Kentucky operator’s license under this chapter if the person is:

A member of the Armed Forces of the United States stationed in Kentucky who maintains a home of record for military purposes outside of Kentucky;

The member’s spouse; or

The member’s child or stepchild who is sixteen (16) years of age or older and a dependent or under guardianship of the member.

History.

2739m-36: amend. Acts 1946, ch. 127, § 2; 1996, ch. 198, § 6, effective October 1, 1996; 2002, ch. 264, § 5, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 100, § 15, effective January 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 65, § 1, effective June 29, 2021.

Opinions of Attorney General.

An individual whose privilege of operating a motor vehicle in Kentucky is under suspension is prohibited from operating a vehicle in Kentucky notwithstanding he may hold a driver’s license issued by another state.

OAG 65-334

.

An Indiana resident, under a valid instruction permit from Indiana, may take driver’s education training at a Kentucky high school.

OAG 74-739

.

A person who operates a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state must have either a valid Kentucky operator’s license or a valid operator’s permit from another state; failure to possess either of the above mentioned operator’s licenses means that the person is in violation of KRS 186.620(2) if he operates a motor vehicle upon the highways of this state.

OAG 83-67

.

If a nonresident who has no Kentucky driver’s license, has had his license suspended or revoked by the issuing state, he then has no right to drive a motor vehicle upon the highways of Kentucky.

OAG 83-67

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Suspension for nonpayment of judgment — Exception,
KRS

187.410

.

186.435.
Application for operator’s license by driver who becomes Kentucky resident — Verification of status in other jurisdiction — Procedures for permanent residents — Application of driver who becomes Kentucky resident.

Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, a licensed driver who becomes a Kentucky resident shall, within thirty (30) days of establishing residency, apply for a Kentucky operator’s license to the Transportation Cabinet.

The Transportation Cabinet shall, before issuing a person a Kentucky operator’s license, verify through the National Drivers Register that the person applying for a Kentucky operator’s license does not currently have his or her operator’s license or driving privilege suspended or revoked in another licensing jurisdiction.

A person who is not a United States citizen but who has been granted permanent resident status by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services, and who is a Kentucky resident, shall follow the same procedures for applying for an original, renewal, transfer, or duplicate operator’s license as persons who are United States citizens.

A licensed driver from another jurisdiction who:

Is not a United States citizen;

Has not been granted permanent resident status by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Bureau of Citizenship and Immigration Services;

Becomes a Kentucky resident; and

Wishes to operate a motor vehicle;

shall, within thirty (30) days of establishing residency, apply for a Kentucky operator’s license under the provisions of KRS

186.4121

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2002, ch. 264, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2017 ch. 100, § 16, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 12, effective March 27, 2020.

186.440.
Persons ineligible for operator’s license — Reinstatement fee.

An operator’s license shall not be granted to:

Any person who is not a resident of Kentucky;

Any person under the age of sixteen (16);

Any person under the age of eighteen (18) who holds a valid Kentucky instruction permit issued pursuant to KRS

186.450

, but who has not graduated from high school or who is not enrolled and successfully participating in school or who is not being schooled at home, except those persons who satisfy the District Court of appropriate venue pursuant to KRS

159.051

(3) that revocation of their license would create an undue hardship. Persons under the age of eighteen (18) shall present proof of complying with the requirements of KRS

159.051

;

Any person whose operator’s license has been suspended, during the period of suspension, subject to the limitations of KRS

186.442

;

Any person whose operator’s license has been revoked, nor to any nonresident whose privilege of exemption under KRS

186.430

has been refused or discontinued, until the expiration of the period for which the license was revoked, or for which the privilege was refused or discontinued;

Any applicant adjudged incompetent by judicial decree;

Any person who in the opinion of the Department of Kentucky State Police, after examination, is unable to exercise reasonable and ordinary control over a motor vehicle upon the highways;

Any person who is unable to understand highway warnings or direction signs in the English language;

Any person required by KRS

186.480

to take an examination who has not successfully passed the examination;

Any person required by KRS Chapter 187 to deposit proof of financial responsibility, who has not deposited that proof;

Any person who has not filed a correct and complete application attested to in the presence of a person authorized to administer oaths;

Any person who cannot meet the requirements set forth in KRS 186.411(1) or (3); or

Any person whose operator’s license has been suspended or revoked under the provisions of KRS Chapter 186, 187, or 189A who has not paid the reinstatement fee required under KRS

186.531

.

History.

2739m-37: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 78, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 170; 1974, ch. 306, § 2; 1978, ch. 92, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 88, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 123, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 63, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 234, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 267, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 416, § 7, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 455, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 341, § 10, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 198, § 4, effective October 1, 1996; 1998, ch. 442, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 264, § 6, effective July 15, 2002; 2003, ch. 189, § 2, effective June 24, 2003; 2007, ch. 85, § 193, effective June 26, 2007; 2017 ch. 100, § 24, effective January 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 51, § 13, effective March 27, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/94). This section was amended by 1994 Ky. Acts chs. 267, 416, and 455. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 416, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.